District of Columbia statutes.
16-4602.02

Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in § 16-4602.04, a court of the District which has made a child-custody determination consistent with §§ 16-4602.01 or 16-4602.03 has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over the determination until:

(1)

A court of the District determines that neither the child, nor the child and one parent, nor the child and any person acting as a parent have a significant connection with the District and that substantial evidence is no longer available in the District concerning the child’s care, protection, training, and personal relationships; or

(2)

A court of the District or a court of another state determines that the child, the child’s parents, and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in the District.

(b)

A court of the District which has made a child-custody determination and does not have exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify that determination only if it has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under § 16-4602.01.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4602.03.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 202 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).